Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-3425
Health care providers; assumption of validity.

Health care providers shall be entitled to assume the validity of a power of attorney for health care executed in this state until given actual notice to the contrary.

Laws 1992, LB 696, § 32.